District of Columbia statutes.
29-922

Limitations upon the return on capital.

(a)

The return upon capital shall not exceed 6% per annum upon the paid-up capital and shall be noncumulative.

(b)

Total return upon capital distributed for any single period shall not exceed 50% of the net savings for that period.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-931.

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-922.
1981 Ed., § 29-1122.
1973 Ed., § 29-822.